Utah statutes.
16-7-14.   Restatement of articles of incorporation.

(1)  A corporation sole organized under this chapter may restate its articles of incorporation in the same manner allowed nonprofit corporations under Section 16-6a-1006.

(2) (a)  The restated articles shall be adopted on behalf of the corporation by the appropriate incorporator or the successor to an incorporator as described in Section 16-7-2.

(b)  If there is no such incorporator or successor, the articles shall be signed by the officer or official authorized to administer the affairs and property of the corporation according to the practices and procedures of the church, denomination, or religious society.

(c)  The restated articles described in this section shall specify the name, title, and street address of the person executing the restated articles.

(3)  This chapter does not require the restated articles described in this section to specify a value of the property of the corporation sole.

(4)  A corporation sole restating its articles of incorporation after May 3, 2004, shall comply with Subsection 16-7-15(1).



Amended by Chapter 16, 2004 General Session

